Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4335.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 30.17 of Title 4, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. A county or municipality, or any agency thereof may:
1. Adopt or enforce rules, administrative regulations, codes,
or ordinances relating to the operation of a retail pet shop;
provided the pet shop is in compliance with the Commercial Pet

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4335 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Bree ders and Animal Shelter Licensing Act and other applicable
rules, regulation, codes, or ordinances; and
2. Regulate and inspect retail pet stores but may not ban or
otherwise effectively prohibit a retail pet shop or retail pet shop
owner for selling dogs and cats within the county or municipality
unless the shop or owner has received three or more convictions over
five (5) years for violating the Commercial Pet Breeders and Animal
Shelter Licensing Act.
B. This section does not apply to any county or municipal
ordinance enacted prior to January 1, 2026.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 4 O.S. 2021, Section 30.8, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 30.8. A. An animal shelter operator or commercial pet
breeder who is not in violation of the Commercial Pet Breeders and
Animal Shelter Licensing Act or any rule adopted under the
Commercial Pet Breeders and Animal Shelter Licensing Act may renew
the license of the person by:
1. Submitting a renewal application to the Oklahoma Department
of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry on the form prescribed by the
Department;
2. Complying with any other renewal requirements adopted by the
Department; and
3. Paying the required fee.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4335 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

B. Any person who fails to apply for a renewal in a manner
prescribed by the Department, and whose license has expired, may not
engage in activities that require a license until the license has
been renewed.
C. Not later than sixty (60) ninety (90) days before the
expiration of the license, the Department shall send written notice
of the impending license expiration to the animal shelter operator
or commercial pet breeder at the last-known address according to the
records of the Department.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON LOCAL AND COUNTY GOVERNMENT
April 14, 2026 - DO PASS













SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4335 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)